Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1464
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate five million dollars each fiscal year to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice for purposes of carrying out the Law Enforcement Attraction and Retention Act.

Laws 2022, LB1241, § 11.
July 1, 2022June 30, 2028